Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-306
Plowing up road; road overseer; duty to file complaint; violation; penalty.

It is hereby made the duty of the road overseer or other officer in charge of road work in the area where such road is located to make complaint to the county attorney of any violation of section 39-305. Any willful neglect of this duty by a road overseer or other such officer shall be considered a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1899, c. 58, § 3, p. 285;

R.S.1913, § 3033;

C.S.1922, § 2784;

C.S.1929, § 39-1019;

R.S.1943, § 39-707;

Laws 1959, c. 181, § 8, p. 657;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 36;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-707;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 30.